dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- সর্বাধিক; সর্বাধিক -->
    <pardef n="সর্বাধিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উত্তেজিত; উত্তেজিত -->
    <pardef n="উত্তেজিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ব্যাপক; ব্যাপক -->
    <pardef n="ব্যাপক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উদ্ভূত; উদ্ভূত -->
    <pardef n="উদ্ভূত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অলস; অলস -->
    <pardef n="অলস__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভারতীয়; ভারতীয় -->
    <pardef n="ভারতীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নির্জন; নির্জন -->
    <pardef n="নির্জন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বর্বরোচিত; বর্বরোচিত -->
    <pardef n="বর্বরোচিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাজানো; সাজানো -->
    <pardef n="সাজানো__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চঞ্চল; চঞ্চল -->
    <pardef n="চঞ্চল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গভীরতম; গভীর -->
    <pardef n="গভীর/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আন্তর্জাতিক; আন্তর্জাতিক -->
    <pardef n="আন্তর্জাতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুপরিচিত; সুপরিচিত -->
    <pardef n="সুপরিচিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দৃঢ়; দৃঢ় -->
    <pardef n="দৃঢ়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতিদিন; প্রতিদিন -->
    <pardef n="প্রতিদিন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কঠোর; কঠোর -->
    <pardef n="কঠোর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আমন্ত্রিত; আমন্ত্রিত -->
    <pardef n="আমন্ত্রিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গভীরতর; গভীর -->
    <pardef n="গভীর/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উন্নত; উন্নত -->
    <pardef n="উন্নত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আধুনিক; আধুনিক -->
    <pardef n="আধুনিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিরাপদ; নিরাপদ -->
    <pardef n="নিরাপদ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিশ্চিততম; নিশ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="নিশ্চিত/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘনতর; ঘন -->
    <pardef n="ঘন/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহজভাবে; সহজভাবে -->
    <pardef n="সহজভাবে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরীক্ষামূলক; পরীক্ষামূলক -->
    <pardef n="পরীক্ষামূলক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিপন্ন; বিপন্ন -->
    <pardef n="বিপন্ন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুস্বাদু; সুস্বাদু -->
    <pardef n="সুস্বাদু__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিরাপত্তাহীন; নিরাপত্তাহীন -->
    <pardef n="নিরাপত্তাহীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সর্বোচ্চ; সর্বোচ্চ -->
    <pardef n="সর্বোচ্চ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘনতম; ঘন -->
    <pardef n="ঘন/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ধনাত্মক; ধনাত্মক -->
    <pardef n="ধনাত্মক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কতিপয়; কতিপয় -->
    <pardef n="কতিপয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অপর্যাপ্ত; অপর্যাপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="অপর্যাপ্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্ভাব্য; সম্ভাব্য -->
    <pardef n="সম্ভাব্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কঠোরতম; কঠোর -->
    <pardef n="কঠোর/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- লিখিত; লিখিত -->
    <pardef n="লিখিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সর্বোত্তম; সর্বোত্তম -->
    <pardef n="সর্বোত্তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আক্রমণাত্মক; আক্রমণাত্মক -->
    <pardef n="আক্রমণাত্মক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনন্ত; অনন্ত -->
    <pardef n="অনন্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সরাসরি; সরাসরি -->
    <pardef n="সরাসরি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনন্য; অনন্য -->
    <pardef n="অনন্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কঠোরতর; কঠোর -->
    <pardef n="কঠোর/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহনশীল; সহনশীল -->
    <pardef n="সহনশীল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="সর্বাধিক"><i>সর্বাধিক</i><par n="সর্বাধিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উত্তেজিত"><i>উত্তেজিত</i><par n="উত্তেজিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাপক"><i>ব্যাপক</i><par n="ব্যাপক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভূত"><i>উদ্ভূত</i><par n="উদ্ভূত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অলস"><i>অলস</i><par n="অলস__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভারতীয়"><i>ভারতীয়</i><par n="ভারতীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্জন"><i>নির্জন</i><par n="নির্জন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বর্বরোচিত"><i>বর্বরোচিত</i><par n="বর্বরোচিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাজানো"><i>সাজানো</i><par n="সাজানো__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চঞ্চল"><i>চঞ্চল</i><par n="চঞ্চল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীরতম"><i>গভীর</i><par n="গভীর/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আন্তর্জাতিক"><i>আন্তর্জাতিক</i><par n="আন্তর্জাতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুপরিচিত"><i>সুপরিচিত</i><par n="সুপরিচিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দৃঢ়"><i>দৃঢ়</i><par n="দৃঢ়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিদিন"><i>প্রতিদিন</i><par n="প্রতিদিন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠোর"><i>কঠোর</i><par n="কঠোর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আমন্ত্রিত"><i>আমন্ত্রিত</i><par n="আমন্ত্রিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীরতর"><i>গভীর</i><par n="গভীর/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উন্নত"><i>উন্নত</i><par n="উন্নত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আধুনিক"><i>আধুনিক</i><par n="আধুনিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিরাপদ"><i>নিরাপদ</i><par n="নিরাপদ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিততম"><i>নিশ্চিত</i><par n="নিশ্চিত/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘনতর"><i>ঘন</i><par n="ঘন/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজভাবে"><i>সহজভাবে</i><par n="সহজভাবে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরীক্ষামূলক"><i>পরীক্ষামূলক</i><par n="পরীক্ষামূলক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিপন্ন"><i>বিপন্ন</i><par n="বিপন্ন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুস্বাদু"><i>সুস্বাদু</i><par n="সুস্বাদু__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিরাপত্তাহীন"><i>নিরাপত্তাহীন</i><par n="নিরাপত্তাহীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্বোচ্চ"><i>সর্বোচ্চ</i><par n="সর্বোচ্চ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘনতম"><i>ঘন</i><par n="ঘন/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ধনাত্মক"><i>ধনাত্মক</i><par n="ধনাত্মক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কতিপয়"><i>কতিপয়</i><par n="কতিপয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপর্যাপ্ত"><i>অপর্যাপ্ত</i><par n="অপর্যাপ্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্ভাব্য"><i>সম্ভাব্য</i><par n="সম্ভাব্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠোরতম"><i>কঠোর</i><par n="কঠোর/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="লিখিত"><i>লিখিত</i><par n="লিখিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সর্বোত্তম"><i>সর্বোত্তম</i><par n="সর্বোত্তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আক্রমণাত্মক"><i>আক্রমণাত্মক</i><par n="আক্রমণাত্মক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনন্ত"><i>অনন্ত</i><par n="অনন্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সরাসরি"><i>সরাসরি</i><par n="সরাসরি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনন্য"><i>অনন্য</i><par n="অনন্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কঠোরতর"><i>কঠোর</i><par n="কঠোর/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহনশীল"><i>সহনশীল</i><par n="সহনশীল__adj"/></e>
